th: พื้นผิวดินเหนียว/ลื่น: ผมหยาบ; สื่อ; เรียบ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Текстура глина/шликер: Груб; Среден; Мек; Други
hu: Agyag/Agyagpép textúrája: Durva; Közepesen durva; Sima; Egyéb
fi: Saven/savilietteen koostumus: Karkeat; Keskimääräinen; Sileä; Muu
cs: Textura skluzu: Hrubé; Médium; Hladký; Jiné
hr-HR: Tekstura gline/šlikera: Gruba; Srednja; Glatka; Ostalo
zh-TW: 黏土/泥漿質地: 濃密; 媒介; 光滑; 其他
ru: Текстура глины или шликера: Грубый; Средний; Гладкий; Другой
de: Ton/Schlicker Textur: Grob; Medium; Glatt; Sonstiges
nl: Structuur klei/slip: Grof; Medium; Glad; Andere
zh-CN: 粘土/浆料质地: 粗发丝; 媒介; 光滑; 其他
en: Clay/Slip texture: Coarse; Medium; Smooth; Other
it: Texture argilla/scivolo: Grossi; Medium; Liscio; Altro
sv: Textur av lera/slip: Tjockt; Medium; Slät; Övrigt
tr: Kil/Kaygan doku: Kalın; Orta; Pürüzsüz; Diğer
pl: Tekstura poślizgu/gliny: Filtr zgrubny; Środek; Gładki; Inne
ro-RO: Textură argilă/material de alunecare: Grunjoasă; Medie; Omogenă; Altele
da: Ler-/gitningstekstur: Groft; Medium; Glat; Andet
pt-PT: Textura Argila/Deslizante: Áspero; Médio; Macio; Outro
ko: 클레이/슬립 질감: 거친; 매체; 매끄러운; 기타
nb: Leire/glatt tekstur: Grovt; Middels; Glatt; Annet
ja: 粘土/スリップテクスチャ: 硬毛; 媒体; スムース; その他
pt-BR: Textura de argila/argila líquida: Espesso; Médio; Suave; Outro
sl-SI: Tekstura gline/tekoče gline: Grobo; Srednja; Gladka; Drugo
el: Υφή πηλού/λάσπης: Τραχιές; Μέση; Ήπια; Άλλο
fr: Texture argileuse/glissante: Épais; Moyen; Lisse; Autre
vi: Kết cấu đất sét: Tóc thô; Vừa; Nhẵn; Khác
sk-SK: Textúra hliny/tekutej hliny: Hrubý; Stredný; Hladký; Iné
es: Textura de la arcilla/barbotina: Grueso; Medio; Suave; Otros
lt-LT: Molio / molio mišinio tekstūra: Šiurkštus; Vidutinis; Glotnus; Kita